Utah statutes.
53B-16-202.   Curricula at the community colleges.

The curricula at the colleges shall include vocational and technical education, courses of a general nature which can be transferred to other higher education institutions, adult and continuing education, and developmental education.  The colleges also provide needed community service. Vocational and technical education continues as the highest priority role of the colleges; and to ensure its continued emphasis, the Board of Regents shall develop specific funding mechanisms which will maintain the high priority treatment of these programs and address the fact that many vocational programs are more costly than general education/transfer programs.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 8, 1987 General Session

